Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.120

State strategic plan for supply of health care personnel—Reports.

The board shall:

(1) Facilitate ongoing collaboration among stakeholders in order to address the health care personnel shortage;

(2) In collaboration with stakeholders, establish and maintain a state strategic plan for ensuring an adequate supply of health care personnel that safeguards the ability of the health care delivery system in Washington state to provide quality, accessible health care to residents of Washington; and

(3) Report to the governor and legislature by December 31, 2003, and annually thereafter, on progress on the state plan and make additional recommendations as necessary.

[ 2003 c 278 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2003 c 278: "The legislature finds and declares:

(1) There is a severe shortage of health care personnel in Washington state;

(2) The shortage contributes to increased costs in health care and threatens the ability of the health care system to provide adequate and accessible services;

(3) The current shortage of health care personnel is structural rather than the cyclical shortages of the past, and this is due to demographic changes that will increase demand for health care services;

(4) An increasing proportion of the population will reach retirement age, and an increasing proportion of health care personnel will also reach retirement age; and

(5) There should be continuing collaboration among health care workforce stakeholders to address the shortage of health care personnel." [ 2003 c 278 s 1.]